Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3589
Hospital authority; trustees; meetings; officers; expenses; seal; rules and regulations.

Within thirty days after the county board shall have declared the authority a public corporation, the trustees so appointed by the county board shall meet and elect one of their number chairperson, one of their number vice-chairperson, and one of their number secretary of the authority. The trustees shall serve without compensation, except that each shall be allowed his or her actual and necessary traveling and incidental expenses incurred in the performance of his or her official duties with reimbursement for mileage to be made at the rate provided in section 81-1176. The board shall (1) adopt a seal, bearing the name of the authority, (2) keep a record of all of its proceedings which shall be open to inspection by all interested persons during regular business hours and under reasonable circumstances, and (3) establish the time and place of holding its regular meetings and the manner of calling special meetings and shall have the power from time to time to pass all necessary resolutions, orders, rules, and regulations for the necessary conduct of its business and to carry into effect the objects for which such authority was formed.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 14;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.87;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 18.